Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 5. Statewide Tax Increment Financing

§ 1891.
Definitions.

When used in this subchapter:

“Municipality” means a city, town, or incorporated village.

“District” or “TIF” means a tax increment financing district.

“Legislative body” means the mayor and alderboard, the city council, the selectboard, and the president and trustees of an incorporated village, as appropriate.

“Improvements” means the installation, new construction, or reconstruction of infrastructure that will serve a public purpose and fulfill the purpose of tax increment financing districts as stated in section 1893 of this subchapter, including utilities, transportation, public facilities and amenities, land and property acquisition and demolition, and site preparation.

“Original taxable value” means the total valuation as determined in accordance with 32 V.S.A. chapter 129 of all taxable real property located within the tax increment financing district as of the creation date as set forth in section 1892 of this subchapter, provided that no parcel within the district shall be divided or bisected by the district boundary.

“Related costs” means expenses incurred and paid by the municipality, exclusive of the actual cost of constructing and financing improvements, that are directly related to the creation and implementation of the tax increment financing district, including reimbursement of sums previously advanced by the municipality for those purposes. Related costs may include direct municipal expenses such as departmental or personnel costs related to creating or administering the district to the extent they are paid from the tax increment realized from municipal and not education taxes and using only that portion of the municipal increment above the required percentage in servicing the debt as determined in accordance with subsection 1894(f) of this subchapter.

“Financing” means debt incurred, including principal, interest, and any fees or charges directly related to that debt, or other instruments or borrowing used by a municipality to pay for improvements in a tax increment financing district, only if authorized by the legal voters of the municipality in accordance with section 1894 of this subchapter. Payment for the cost of district improvements may also include direct payment by the municipality using the district increment. However, such payment is also subject to a vote by the legal voters of the municipality in accordance with section 1894 of this subchapter and, if not included in the tax increment financing plan approved under subsection 1894(d) of this subchapter, is also considered a substantial change and subject to the review process provided by subdivision 1901(2)(B) of this subchapter. If interfund loans within the municipality are used as the method of financing, no interest shall be charged.

“Committed” means pledged and appropriated for the purpose of the current and future payment of tax increment financing incurred in accordance with section 1894 of this subchapter and related costs as defined in this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 87

; amended

2005, No. 184

(Adj. Sess.), § 2a;

2007, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 54, eff. June 6, 2008;

2013, No. 80

, § 2;

2019, No. 14

, § 66, eff. April 30, 2019.

§ 1892.
Creation of district.

Upon a finding that such action will serve the public purposes of this subchapter and subject to subsection (d) of this section, the legislative body of any municipality may create within its jurisdiction a special district to be known as a tax increment financing district. The district shall be described by its boundaries and the properties therein and the district boundary shall be shown on a plan entitled “Proposed Tax Increment Financing District (municipal name), Vermont.” The legislative body shall hold one or more public hearings, after public notice, on the proposed plan.

When adopted by the act of the legislative body of that municipality, the plan shall be recorded with the municipal clerk and lister or assessor, and the creation of the district shall occur at 12:01 a.m. on April 1 of the calendar year so voted by the municipal legislative body.

A municipality that has approved the creation of a district under this section may designate a coordinating agency from outside the municipality’s departments or offices to administer the district to ensure compliance with this subchapter and any statutory or other requirements and may claim this expense as a related cost. However, the coordinating agency shall not be authorized to enter into any agreement or make any covenant on behalf of the municipality.

The following municipalities have been authorized to use education tax increment financing for a tax increment financing district:

the City of Burlington, Downtown;

the City of Burlington, Waterfront;

the Town of Milton, North and South;

the City of Newport;

the City of Winooski;

the Town of Colchester;

the Town of Hartford;

the City of St. Albans;

the City of Barre;

the Town of Milton, Town Core; and

the City of South Burlington.

On or before January 15, 2018, the Joint Fiscal Office, with the assistance of the consulting Legislative Economist, the Department of Taxes, the State Auditor, and the Agency of Commerce and Community Development in consultation with the Vermont Economic Progress Council, shall examine and report to the General Assembly on the use of both tax increment financing districts and other policy options for State assistance to municipalities for funding infrastructure in support of economic development and the capacity of Vermont to utilize TIF districts moving forward.

The report shall include:

a recommendation for a sustainable statewide capacity level for TIFs or comparable economic development tools and relevant permitting criteria;

the positive and negative impacts on the State’s fiscal health of TIFs and other tools, including the General Fund and Education Fund;

the economic development impacts on the State of TIFs and other tools, both positive and negative;

the mechanics for ensuring geographic diversity of TIFs or other tools throughout the State; and

the parameters of TIFs and other tools in other states.

Beginning in 2021 and every four years thereafter, on or before January 15, the Joint Fiscal Office, with the assistance of the consulting Legislative Economist, the Department of Taxes, and the Agency of Commerce and Community Development in consultation with the Vermont Economic Progress Council, shall examine the recommendations and conclusions of the tax increment financing capacity study and report created pursuant to subsection (e) of this section, and shall submit to the Emergency Board and to the House Committees on Commerce and Economic Development and on Ways and Means and the Senate Committees on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs and on Finance an updated summary report that includes:

an assessment of any material changes from the initial report concerning TIFs and other tools and an assessment of the health and sustainability of the tax increment financing system in Vermont;

short-term and long-term projections on the positive and negative fiscal impacts of the TIF districts or other tools, as applicable, that are currently active or authorized in the State;

a review of the size and affordability of the net indebtedness for TIF districts and an estimate of the maximum amount of new long-term net debt that prudently may be authorized for TIF districts or other tools in the next fiscal year.

Annually, based on the analysis and recommendations included in the reports required in this section, the General Assembly shall consider the amount of new long-term net debt that prudently may be authorized for TIF districts in the next fiscal year and determine whether to expand the number of TIF districts or similar economic development tools in addition to the previously approved districts referenced in subsection (d) of this section and the six additional districts authorized by

32 V.S.A. § 5404a(f)

.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 87

; amended

2013, No. 80

, § 3;

2017, No. 69

, § J.2, eff. June 28, 2017;

2018, No. 11

(Sp. Sess.), § H.30.

§ 1893.
Purpose.

The purpose of tax increment financing districts is to provide revenues for improvements that serve the district and related costs, which will stimulate development or redevelopment within the district, provide for employment opportunities, improve and broaden the tax base, or enhance the general economic vitality of the municipality, the region, or the State.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 87

; amended

2005, No. 184

(Adj. Sess.), § 2b;

2007, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 55, eff. June 6, 2008.

§ 1894.
Power and life of district.

Incurring indebtedness.

A municipality approved under

32 V.S.A. § 5404a(h)

may incur indebtedness against revenues of the tax increment financing district at any time during a period of up to five years following the creation of the district. If no debt is incurred during this five-year period, the district shall terminate, unless the Vermont Economic Progress Council grants an extension to a municipality pursuant to subsection (d) of this section. However, if any indebtedness is incurred within the first five years after the creation of the district, then the district has a total of ten years after the creation of the district to incur any additional debt.

Any indebtedness incurred under subdivision (1) of this subsection may be retired over any period authorized by the legislative body of the municipality.

The district shall continue until the date and hour the indebtedness is retired or, if no debt is incurred, five years following the creation of the district.

Use of the education property tax increment. For only debt incurred within the period permitted under subdivision (a)(1) of this section after creation of the district, and related costs, up to 70 percent of the education tax increment may be retained for up to 20 years, beginning with the education tax increment generated the year in which the first debt incurred for improvements financed in whole or in part with incremental education property tax revenue. Upon incurring the first debt, a municipality shall notify the Department of Taxes and the Vermont Economic Progress Council of the beginning of the 20-year retention period of education tax increment.

Use of the municipal property tax increment. For only debt incurred within the period permitted under subdivision (a)(1) of this section after creation of the district, and related costs, not less than 85 percent of the municipal tax increment shall be retained to service the debt, beginning the first year in which debt is incurred, pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

Approval of tax increment financing plan. The Vermont Economic Progress Council shall approve a municipality’s tax increment financing plan prior to a public vote to pledge the credit of that municipality under subsection (h) of this section. The tax increment financing plan shall include all information related to the proposed financing necessary for approval by the Council and to assure its viability and consistency with the tax increment financing district plan approved by the Council pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 5404a(h)

. The tax increment financing plan may be submitted to and approved by the Council concurrently with the tax increment financing district plan. If no indebtedness is incurred within five years after the creation of the district, the municipality may submit an updated executive summary of the tax increment financing district plan and an updated tax increment financing plan to the Council to obtain approval for a five-year extension of the period to incur indebtedness; provided, however, that the updated plan is submitted prior to the five-year termination date of the district. The Council shall review the updated tax increment financing plan to determine whether the plan has continued viability and consistency with the approved tax increment financing plan. Upon approval of the updated tax increment financing plan, the Council shall grant an extension of the period to incur indebtedness of no more than five years. The submission of an updated tax increment financing plan as provided in this subsection shall operate as a stay of the termination of the district until the Council has determined whether to approve the plan.

Proportionality. The municipal legislative body may commit the State education and municipal tax increments received from properties contained within the tax increment financing district for the financing of improvements and for related costs only in the same proportion by which the improvement or related costs serve the district, as determined by the Council when approved in accordance with

32 V.S.A. § 5404a(h)

, and in the case of an improvement that does not reasonably lend itself to a proportionality formula, the Council shall apply a rough proportionality and rational nexus test.

Required share of increment. If any tax increment utilization is approved pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 5404a(h)

, not more than 70 percent of the State property tax increment and not less than 85 percent of the municipal tax increment may be approved by the Council or used by the municipality to service this debt.

Adjustment of percentage. During the tenth year following the creation of the tax increment financing district, the municipality shall submit an updated tax increment financing plan to the Council which shall include adjustments and updates of appropriate data and information sufficient for the Council to determine, based on tax increment financing debt actually incurred and the history of increment generated during the first ten years, whether the percentages approved under subsection (f) of this section should be continued or adjusted to a lower percentage to be retained for the remaining duration of the retention period and still provide sufficient municipal and education increment to service the remaining debt.

Vote required on each instance of debt. Notwithstanding any provision of any municipal charter, each instance of borrowing to finance or otherwise pay for tax increment financing district improvements shall occur only after the legal voters of the municipality, by a majority vote of all voters present and voting on the question at a special or annual municipal meeting duly warned for the purpose, authorize the legislative body to pledge the credit of the municipality, borrow, or otherwise secure the debt for the specific purposes so warned; provided that each request to pledge the credit of the municipality for the purposes of financing tax increment financing district improvements shall include the new amount of debt proposed to be incurred and the total outstanding tax increment financing debt approved to date.

Notice to voters. A municipal legislative body shall provide information to the public prior to the public vote required under subsection (h) of this section. This information shall include the amount and types of debt and related costs to be incurred, including principal, interest, and fees, terms of the debt, the improvements to be financed, the expected development to occur because of the improvements, and notice to the voters that if the tax increment received by the municipality from any property tax source is insufficient to pay the principal and interest on the debt in any year, for whatever reason, including a decrease in property value or repeal of a State property tax source, unless determined otherwise at the time of such repeal, the municipality shall remain liable for the full payment of the principal and interest for the term of indebtedness. If interfund loans within the municipality are used, the information must also include documentation of the terms and conditions of such loan. If interfund loans within the municipality are used as the method of financing, no interest shall be charged.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 87

; amended

1987, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2005, No. 184

(Adj. Sess.), § 2c;

2007, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 56, eff. June 6, 2008;

2011, No. 45

, § 15, eff. May 24, 2011;

2013, No. 80

, § 4;

2013, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 8, 9, eff. June 4, 2014;

2017, No. 69

, § J.3. eff. June 28, 2017.

§ 1895.
Original taxable value.

As of the date the district is created, the lister or assessor for the municipality shall certify the original taxable value and shall certify to the legislative body in each year thereafter during the life of the district the amount by which the total valuation as determined in accordance with 32 V.S.A. chapter 129 of all taxable real property located within the tax increment financing district has increased or decreased relative to the original taxable value.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 87

; amended

2013, No. 80

, § 5;

2013, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. June 4, 2014.

§ 1896.
Tax increments.

In each year following the creation of the district, the listers or assessor shall include no more than the original taxable value of the real property in the assessed valuation upon which the treasurer computes the rates of all taxes levied by the municipality and every other taxing district in which the tax increment financing district is situated; but the treasurer shall extend all rates so determined against the entire assessed valuation of real property for that year. In each year for which the assessed valuation exceeds the original taxable value, the municipality shall hold apart, rather than remit to the taxing districts, that proportion of all taxes paid that year on the real property in the district which the excess valuation bears to the total assessed valuation. The amount held apart each year is the “tax increment” for that year. No more than the percentages established pursuant to section 1894 of this subchapter of the municipal and State education tax increments received with respect to the district and committed for the payment for financing for improvements and related costs shall be segregated by the municipality in a special tax increment financing account and in its official books and records until all capital indebtedness of the district has been fully paid. The final payment shall be reported to the treasurer, who shall thereafter include the entire assessed valuation of the district in the assessed valuations upon which municipal and other tax rates are computed and extended and thereafter no taxes from the district shall be deposited in the district’s tax increment financing account.

[Repealed.]

Notwithstanding any charter provision or other provision, all property taxes assessed within a district shall be subject to the provision of subsection (a) of this section. Special assessments levied under chapters 76A or 87 of this title or under a municipal charter shall not be considered property taxes for the purpose of this section if the proceeds are used exclusively for operating expenses related to properties within the district, and not for improvements within the district, as defined in subdivision 1891(4) of this title.

Amounts held apart under subsection (a) of this section shall only be used for financing and related costs as defined in section 1891 of this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 87

; amended

1987, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2005, No. 184

(Adj. Sess.), § 2d;

2007, No. 66

, § 24, eff. July 1, 2006;

2007, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 57, eff. June 6, 2008;

2013, No. 80

, § 6;

2013, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. June 4, 2014;

2015, No. 57

, § 63.

§ 1897.
Repealed. 2013, No. 80, § 7.

§ 1898.
Powers supplemental; construction.

The powers conferred by this subchapter are supplemental and alternative to other powers conferred by law, and this subchapter is intended as an independent and comprehensive conferral of powers to accomplish the purposes set forth herein.

A municipality shall have power to issue from time to time general obligation bonds, revenue bonds, or revenue bonds also backed by the municipality’s full faith and credit in its discretion to finance the undertaking of any improvements wholly or partly within such district. If revenue bonds are issued, such bonds shall be made payable, as to both principal and interest, solely from the income proceeds, revenues, tax increments, and funds of the municipality derived from or held in connection with its undertaking and carrying out of improvements under this chapter.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose.

Bonds issued under this section shall be authorized by resolution or ordinance of the local governing body and may be payable upon demand or mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denomination or denominations, be in registered form, carry such conversion or registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium or payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption, such other characteristics, as may be provided by such resolution or trust indenture or mortgage issued pursuant thereto.

[Repealed.]

Such bonds may be sold at not less than par at public or private sales held after notice published prior to such sale in a newspaper having a general circulation in the municipality.

In case any of the public officials of the municipality whose signatures appear on any bonds or coupons issued under this chapter shall cease to be such officials before the delivery of such bonds, such signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such officials had remained in office until such delivery. Any provisions of any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall be fully negotiable.

In any suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or enforceability of any bond issued under this chapter or the security therefor, any such bond reciting in substance that it has been issued by the municipality in connection with an improvement, as herein defined, shall be conclusively deemed to have been issued for such purpose and such improvement shall be conclusively deemed to have been planned, located, and carried out in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 87

; amended

1987, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 3-6;

2005, No. 184

(Adj. Sess.), § 2f;

2007, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 59, eff. June 6, 2008;

2009, No. 54

, § 37, eff. June 1, 2009;

2013, No. 80

, § 8.

§ 1899.
Bonds as legal investments.

All banks, trust companies, bankers, savings banks and institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking or investment business; all insurance companies, insurance associations, and other persons carrying on an insurance business; and all executors, administrators, curators, trustees, and other fiduciaries, may legally invest any sinking funds, monies, or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds or other obligations issued by a municipality pursuant to this chapter.
It is the purpose of this section to authorize any persons, political subdivisions, and officers, public or private, to use any funds owned or controlled by them for the purchase of any such bonds or other obligations.
Nothing contained in this section with regard to legal investments shall be construed as relieving any person of any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 87

.

§ 1900.
Distribution.

In addition to all other provisions of this subchapter, with respect to any tax increment financing district, of the municipal and education tax increments received in any tax year that exceed the amounts committed for the payment of the financing for improvements and related costs in the district, equal portions of each increment may be retained for the following purposes: prepayment of principal and interest on the financing, placed in a special account required by section 1896 of this subchapter and used for future financing payments, or used for defeasance of the financing. Any remaining portion of the excess municipal tax increment shall be distributed to the city, town, or village budget, in proportion that each budget bears to the combined total of the budgets unless otherwise negotiated by the city, town, or village; and any remaining portion of the excess education tax increment shall be distributed to the Education Fund.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 7; amended

2005, No. 184

(Adj. Sess.), § 2g;

2007, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 60, eff. June 6, 2008;

2013, No. 80

, § 9.

§ 1901.
Information reporting.

Every municipality with an active tax increment financing district shall:

Develop a system, segregated for the tax increment financing district, to identify, collect, and maintain all data and information necessary to fulfill the reporting requirements of this section, including performance measures.

Throughout the year, as required by events:

provide notification to the Vermont Economic Progress Council and the Department of Taxes regarding any tax increment financing debt obligations, public votes, or votes by the municipal legislative body immediately following such obligation or vote on a form prescribed by the Council, including copies of public notices, agendas, minutes, vote tally, and a copy of the information provided to the public in accordance with subsection 1894(i) of this subchapter;

submit any proposed substantial changes to be made to the approved tax increment district plan and approved financing plan to the Council for review, only after receiving approval for the substantial change through a vote of the municipal legislative body.

Annually:

Ensure that the tax increment financing district account required by section 1896 of this subchapter is subject to the annual audit prescribed in sections 1681 and 1690 of this title. Procedures must include verification of the original taxable value and annual and total municipal and education tax increments generated, expenditures for debt and related costs, and current balance.

On or before February 15 of each year, on a form prescribed by the Council, submit an annual report to the Vermont Economic Progress Council and the Department of Taxes, including the information required by subdivision (2) of this section if not already submitted during the year, all information required by subdivision (A) of this subdivision (3), and the information required by

32 V.S.A. § 5404a(i)

, including performance measures and any other information required by the Council or the Department of Taxes.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 62, eff. June 6, 2008; amended

2013, No. 80

, § 10;

2013, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. June 4, 2014;

2015, No. 11

, § 27;

2015, No. 57

, § 62, eff. June 11, 2015.